Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-103.50
Channel pricing, defined.

Channel pricing means a pricing strategy that differentiates the price charged for a product based upon the type of license held by the retailer and the primary use of the premises on which the retailer operates.

Laws 2023, LB376, § 3.